Mississippi statutes. Title 67. Alcoholic Beverages
Chapter 9. Possession or Transportation of Alcoholic Beverages, Light Wine, or Beer

§ 67-9-1.
Transportation and possession of alcoholic beverages, light wine and beer by person holding an alcohol processing permit.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any section of Title 27 or 67, Mississippi Code of 1972, it shall be lawful for any person holding an alcohol processing permit to transport and possess alcoholic beverages, light wine and beer, in any part of the state, for his or her use in cooking, processing or manufacturing products which contain alcoholic beverages as an integral ingredient, in amounts as limited by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division of the State Tax Commission. The authority to transport and possess alcoholic beverages, light wine and beer under this section exists regardless of whether (a) the county or municipality in which the transportation or possession takes place has voted for or against coming out from under the dry law, or (b) the transportation, storage, sale, distribution, receipt or manufacture of light wine and beer otherwise is prohibited.

The provisions of this section shall not be construed as amending, repealing or otherwise affecting any statute or any lawfully adopted ordinance, rule or regulation that prohibits or restricts the location at which, or the premises upon which, alcoholic beverages, light wine or beer may be sold or consumed.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 417, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1996.